Hawaii statutes.
§435H-3 Funding. (a) The connector
may receive contributions, grants, endowments, fees, or gifts in cash or
otherwise from public and private sources including corporations, businesses,
foundations, governments, individuals, and other sources subject to rules
adopted by the board. The State may appropriate moneys to the connector. As
required by section 1311(d)(5)(A) of the Federal Act, the connector shall be
self-sustaining by January 1, 2015, and may charge assessments or user fees to
participating health and dental carriers, or may otherwise generate non-insurer
based funding to support its operations. Moneys received by or under the
supervision of the connector shall not be placed into the state treasury and
the State shall not administer any moneys of the connector nor be responsible
for the financial operations or solvency of the connector.

(b) In addition to any other means of
generating revenue pursuant to subsections (a) and (c), the connector may sell
or lease its information technology infrastructure and services to other
separate non-connector programs; provided that the sale or lease is in
compliance with federal regulations.

(c) In addition to any other means of
generating revenue pursuant to subsections (a) and (b), the connector may also
charge fees for displaying advertisements for ancillary services on the
connector's website.

(d) All plans to generate revenue for the
connector shall be in compliance with federal law. [L 2011, c 205, pt of §3; am
L 2014, c 233, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next